Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 2

Circuit and Criminal Divisions Enumerated

16-2-201 — 16-2-231. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 16-2-201 — 16-2-231 (Acts 1931 (2nd E.S.), ch. 38, § 1; 1935, ch. 125, § 1; 1935 Private, ch. 332, § 1; 1937, ch. 59, § 1; 1937, ch. 98, § 1; 1937, ch. 204, § 1; 1937, ch. 205, § 1; 1939, ch. 61, § 1; 1939, ch. 119, § 1; 1943, ch. 28, § 1; 1943, ch. 94, § 1; 1947, ch. 138, §§ 1-3; C. Supp. 1950, § 159; Acts 1951, ch. 12, § 1; 1951, ch. 17, § 1; 1951, ch. 28, § 1; 1951, ch. 73, § 12 (Williams, § 159); Acts 1953, ch. 2, § 1; 1953, ch. 18, § 1; 1953, ch. 206, § 1; 1955, ch. 19, §§ 1, 2; 1955, ch. 104, § 1; 1955, ch. 107, § 1; 1955, ch. 222, § 1; 1957, ch. 2, § 1; 1957, ch. 47, § 1; 1957, ch. 54, § 12; 1957, ch. 95, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 205, § 1; 1957, ch. 226, § 1; 1957, ch. 249, § 1; 1957, ch. 280, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 342, § 1; 1959, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; 1959, ch. 208, §§ 1, 2; 1961, ch. 87, § 1; 1961, ch. 161, §§ 7, 8; 1961, ch. 257, § 1; 1961, ch. 315, § 1; 1963, ch. 262, §§ 1, 2; 1963, ch. 306, § 1; 1963, ch. 344, § 1; 1965, ch. 17, § 1; 1965, ch. 75, § 1; 1965, ch. 188, §§ 1-3; 1965, ch. 204, §§ 1-5; 1965, ch. 274, §§ 2, 3, 9; 1967, ch. 5, § 1; 1967, ch. 7, § 1; 1967, ch. 10, §§ 1-3; 1967, ch. 47, § 1; 1967, ch. 162, § 1; 1967, ch. 228, §§ 1-3, 13; 1967, ch. 247, § 1; 1967, ch. 248, §§ 1, 2, 8; 1968, ch. 433, §§ 1, 2; 1968, ch. 457, §§ 1, 2; 1968, ch. 467, § 1; 1968, ch. 496, § 1; 1968, ch. 616, § 1; 1969, ch. 265, § 1; 1969, ch. 276, §§ 1, 2; 1970, ch. 513, § 1; 1970, ch. 542, § 1; 1971, ch. 239, § 1; 1971, ch. 347, § 1; 1972, ch. 442, §§ 3, 4; 1972, ch. 462, §§ 2, 8; 1972, ch. 515, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 520, § 10; 1972, ch. 593, § 1; 1972, ch. 863, § 8; 1973, ch. 390, § 1; 1974, ch. 526, § 9; 1974, ch. 686, §§ 1, 2; 1974, ch. 711, §§ 1, 2; 1974, ch. 718, §§ 1-3; 1974, ch. 783, §§ 1, 3-5, 8, 9; 1975, ch. 8, § 1; 1975, ch. 14, § 1; 1975, ch. 15, §§ 1, 2; 1975, ch. 94, § 1; 1975, ch. 304, § 1; 1976, ch. 478, § 1; 1976, ch. 518, § 3(b); 1976, ch. 544, § 1; 1977 Private Acts, ch. 51, § 1; 1977, ch. 199, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 216, § 1; 1977, ch. 418, §§ 2, 3, 10-12; 1977, ch. 444, §§ 2, 3; 1978, ch. 707, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 798, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 848, §§ 1, 10; 1979, ch. 150, § 1; 1979, ch. 238, § 1; 1979, ch. 427, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 557, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 803, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 16-207 — 16-236), concerning the enumeration of circuit and criminal divisions, was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 15, which repealed this part except insofar as this part divided existing circuit, criminal or chancery courts into parts or divisions. It was the intent of the general assembly to create new judicial districts in accordance with § 16-2-506, but to retain and continue the existing parts or divisions of the courts as they are set out.

Attorney General Opinions. Laws applicable to the circuit and chancery courts of the 1st Judicial District are T.C.A. Ann. §§ 16-2-201 and 16-2-301 to the extent those statutes divided the courts into parts and divisions; and T.C.A. §§ 16-2-501et seq., OAG 05-072 (5/3/05).

Disclosing terms of consulting contracts for services rendered outside the state, OAG 05-073 (5/4/05).